Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-701
Life insurance; policies; how signed.

All life insurance policies except industrial policies delivered in this state shall be signed by the secretary or assistant secretary; in their absence, by a secretary pro tempore and by the president or vice president, or, in their absence, by two directors, of the company issuing the same.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 118, p. 460;

R.S.1913, § 3255;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IX, § 1, p. 641;

C.S.1922, § 7854;

C.S.1929, § 44-801;

R.S.1943, § 44-701.